src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
Adjective inflection
Nenets  adjectives.

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ to #

* **LEXICON A_ҢЭ** ңэ:ңэ 1  

* **LEXICON A_ПАНЫ** пӑны:пӑны 9 

* **LEXICON A_ХУСУВЭЙ** хусувэй: 10 !!ProsSg -ювна

* **LEXICON A_ХАНО** хӑн: 11 !!ProsSg -увна
[total=27]
хӑн xən°    хӑнӑн’ xənən°h        хӑнˮ xən°q     хӑно xəno

* **LEXICON A_ЕД** ед: 13 !!ProsSg -увна /-ювна

* **LEXICON A_ҢУДИ** ңуда: 15 !!ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ҢОДИ** ңодя: 17 !!ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ХОБ** хоба: 19 !!ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ТЁН** тёня: 20 !!ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ПИСЬ** пися: 21 !!ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ҢАНУ** ңӑно: 23 !!ProsSg -вна
[total=57]
ңӑно ŋəno   ңӑнон’ ŋənon°h ңӑноˮ ŋənoq    ңӑну ŋənu

* **LEXICON A_ЯКЫ** якэ: 24 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON A_ҢУВО** ңумʼ:ңум 25 !!ProsSg -(м)на
ңум’ ŋum     ңумд’ ŋumt°h    ңувˮ ŋuw°q      ңуво ŋuwo

* **LEXICON A_НЮБЕ-Pal/Var** нюмʼ:нюм 26
нюм’ nyum    нюмд’ nyumt°h   нювˮ nyuw°q     нюбе nyubye

* **LEXICON A_ВЫҢО** выʼ:вы 29  

Check this

* **LEXICON A_МЯДО** мяˮ:мя 35   !!ProsSg -мна

LEXICON A_САБЦЬ тир: 12 !!ProsSg -увна
What makes this different from N_ТИРЕ?

* **LEXICON A_САВНЕ** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
